test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-latyng_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.

### NB: we list POSSESSIVE suffixes before CASE MARKERS -- 
### as they appear in surface forms in all UGRIC LANGUAGES

  Noun - ла̄тыӈ: # Noun 122 'word' - full paradigm, FIXME!
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom: ла̄тыӈ
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxSg1+Nom: ла̄тӈум
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxSg2+Nom: ла̄тӈын
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxSg3+Nom: ла̄тӈе
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom: ла̄тыӈме̄н
# (2007: 30) short
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxDu2+Nom: ла̄тӈы̄н
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxDu3+Nom: ла̄тӈе̄н
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom: ла̄тӈув
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxPl2+Nom: ла̄тӈы̄н
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxPl3+Nom: ла̄тӈаныл
     
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Loc: ла̄тыӈт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxSg1+Loc: ла̄тӈумт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxSg2+Loc: ла̄тӈынт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxSg3+Loc: ла̄тӈет
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxDu1+Loc: ла̄тыӈме̄нт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxDu2+Loc: ла̄тӈы̄нт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxDu3+Loc: ла̄тӈе̄нт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxPl1+Loc: ла̄тӈувт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxPl2+Loc: ла̄тӈы̄нт
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxPl3+Loc: ла̄тӈанылт

# (2007: 43) +Lat
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Lat: ла̄тыӈн
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Abl: ла̄тыӈныл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Ins: ла̄тӈыл
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Tra: ла̄тӈыг
     
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Du+Nom: ла̄тӈыг
     ла̄тыӈ+N+Pl+Nom: ла̄тӈыт

# 2-syllable words (2007:19)
# story
     потыр+N+Pl+Nom: потрыт
# village (2007:31)
     па̄выл+N+Pl+Nom: па̄влыт
     па̄выл+N+Sg+Loc: па̄вылт
#    (2007: 43)
     па̄выл+N+Sg+Dat: па̄влын
